Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB634.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1309-B(c) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1309-B. School safety and security coordinator.* * *(c) Specific duties.--The school safety and security coordinator shall:* * *(7) Consider the implementation of a panic alarm system as part of the school safety and security coordinator's <--123456789101112131415161718 review of the school entity's policies and procedures under paragraph (1). ENTITY'S PHYSICAL SAFETY AND SECURITY ASSESSMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH CRITERIA ADOPTED BY THE COMMITTEE. A SCHOOL ENTITY THAT UTILIZES A PANIC ALARM SYSTEM SHALL CONSULT WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES THAT HAVE JURISDICTION OVER SCHOOL PROPERTY AND SHALL DESIGNATE, FOR EACH BUILDING, A PRIMARY LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR LEADING EMERGENCY RESPONSE EFFORTS TRIGGERED BY ACTIVATION OF A PANIC ALARM SYSTEM. THE DESIGNATION SHALL BE INCLUDED IN THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 1319-B. THE SCHOOL ENTITY AND THE PRIMARY LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL JOINTLY DEVELOP WRITTEN RESPONSE PROTOCOLS CONSISTENT WITH THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S COMPREHENSIVE DISASTER RESPONSE AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS PLAN UNDER 35 PA.C.S. § 7701(G) (RELATING TO DUTIES CONCERNING DISASTER PREVENTION). THE COMMITTEE SHALL COLLECT INFORMATION REGARDING SCHOOL ENTITY USE OF PANIC ALARM SYSTEMS AS PART OF THE SURVEY REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 1305-B. As used in this paragraph, the term "panic alarm system" shall mean a silent security system signal generated by the manual activation of a device, including a wired panic button, wireless panic button or mobile or computer application, intended to signal a life-threatening or emergency situation requiring a response from local law enforcement or, in the case of a school building located in a municipality where there is no municipal police department, a location designated by the Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police. LAW ENFORCEMENT. * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0634PN3675 - 2 - <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829